New York, session 2025-2026, A4109.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 120.05 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 4-b to read as follows: 3 4-b. Such person recklessly or intentionally causes physical injury to 4 another person who is sixty-five years of age or older while such person 5 is using or attempting to use or access public transportation; or 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06552-01-5